Massachusetts, session 194th, H1631.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 31 of chapter 94C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after CLASS A, subsection (d)(8) in line 103, 
the following subsections:-  
(9) 7-hydroxymitragynine  
(10) hydroxymitrgynine  
(11) mitragynine